test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-AN-ayapiy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 
  Noun - ayapiy - ok : # -m animate noun, net, Wolvengrey
     ayapiy+N+AN+Sg: ayapiy
     ayapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitayapiy
     ayapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitayapiy
     ayapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otayapiya
     ayapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otayapîyiwa
     ayapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitayapînân
     ayapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitayapînaw
     ayapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitayapîwâw
     ayapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otayapîwâwa
     ayapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otayapîyiwa
     
     ayapiy+N+AN+Pl: ayapiyak
     ayapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitayapiyak
     ayapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitayapiyak
     ayapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otayapiya
     ayapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otayapîyiwa
     ayapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitayapînânak
     ayapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitayapînawak
     ayapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitayapîwâwak
     ayapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otayapîwâwa
     ayapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otayapîyiwa
     
     ayapiy+N+AN+Sg+Obv: ayapiya
     ayapiy+N+AN+Loc: ayapîhk
     ayapiy+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitayapîhk
     ayapiy+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitayapîhk
     ayapiy+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otayapîhk
     ayapiy+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otayapîyihk
     ayapiy+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitayapînâhk
     ayapiy+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitayapînâhk
     ayapiy+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitayapîwâhk
     ayapiy+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otayapîwâhk
     ayapiy+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otayapîyihk
     
     ayapiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [ayapîs, ayapîsis]
     ayapiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [ayapîsak, ayapîsisak]
     
     ayapiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: [nicayapîs, nicayapîsis]
     ayapiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: [kicayapîs, kicayapîsis]
